Illinois, session 104th, HB4725.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Attorney General Act is amended by changing 5Section 6.3 as follows: 6    (15 ILCS 205/6.3)7    Sec. 6.3. Worker Protection Unit.8    (a) The General Assembly finds that the welfare and 9prosperity of all Illinois citizens and businesses requires 10the establishment of a Unit within the Attorney General's 11Office dedicated to combatting businesses that underpay their 12employees, force their employees to work in unsafe conditions, 13and gain an unfair economic advantage by avoiding their tax 14and labor responsibilities. The Worker Protection Unit shall 15be focused on protecting the State's workforce to ensure 16workers are paid properly, guarantee safe workplaces, and 17allow law-abiding business owners to thrive through healthy 18and fair competition. Businesses that violate the State's 19worker protection laws put a greater burden on taxpayers by 20hurting the State's ability to provide critical services; 21compliant businesses cannot compete against those who gain an 22unfair advantage by evading their responsibilities.23    (b) There is created within the Office of the Attorney   HB4725 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 19322 SPS 32768 b1General a Worker Protection Unit, consisting of Assistant 2Attorneys General appointed by the Attorney General, who, 3together with other staff as deemed necessary by the Attorney 4General, shall have the power and duty on behalf of persons 5within this State, to intervene in, initiate, and enforce all 6legal proceedings on matters related to the payment of wages, 7the safety of the workplace, and fair employment practices, 8including, without limitation, the provisions of the 9Prevailing Wage Act, the Employee Classification Act, the 10Minimum Wage Law, the Day and Temporary Labor Services Act, or 11the Wage Payment and Collection Act, and any other law 12regarding labor or employment in this State, whenever the 13Attorney General determines that such action is necessary to 14protect the rights and interests of Illinois workers and 15Illinois businesses.16    (c) Prior to initiating an action, the Attorney General 17shall conduct an investigation and may: (1) require an 18individual or entity to file a statement or report in writing 19under oath or otherwise, as to all information the Attorney 20General may consider necessary; (2) examine under oath any 21person alleged to have participated in or with knowledge of 22the alleged violation; or (3) issue subpoenas for documents; 23(4) require written answers under oath to written 24interrogatories; (5) or conduct hearings in aid of any 25investigation; (6) inspect the premises of an employer and 26inspect and make copies of employment-related records kept at   HB4725 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 19322 SPS 32768 b1the premises during normal business or working hours or at 2other reasonable times; and (7) conduct interviews with 3employees at an employer's premises during normal business or 4working hours or at other reasonable times. The Attorney 5General may, at the Attorney General's discretion, resolve an 6investigation by mutual agreement prior to or after initiating 7an action. 8    (c-5) An employer, or an agent of the employer, who is 9subject to an investigation by the Attorney General shall make 10all reasonable efforts to cooperate with the investigation, 11including, without limitation, by making the employer's 12premises and records available for inspection and by 13permitting the employer's employees to participate in 14confidential interviews conducted by the Attorney General. An 15employer who is subject to an investigation by the Attorney 16General under this Section has the right to be assisted by 17counsel. An employer may refuse to grant the Attorney General 18access to non-publicly accessible areas of the employer's 19premises unless the Attorney General obtains an administrative 20inspection warrant for the inspection of the premises under 21subsection (c-35).22    (c-10) Any individual, including an employee, who 23voluntarily participates in an interview conducted by the 24Attorney General or otherwise provides information to the 25Attorney General related to an investigation conducted by the 26Worker Protection Unit is a confidential government informer   HB4725 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 19322 SPS 32768 b1for purposes of asserting the government informer's privilege.2    (c-15) The production of documentary material in response 3to a subpoena served in accordance with this Section shall be 4made under a sworn certificate, in such form as the subpoena 5designates, by the person, if a natural person, to whom the 6demand is directed or, if not a natural person, by a person or 7persons having knowledge of the facts and circumstances 8relating to the production, to the effect that all of the 9documentary material required by the demand and in the 10possession, custody, or control of the person to whom the 11demand is directed has been produced and made available to the 12custodian. All answers to interrogatories and statements or 13reports produced in writing shall be accompanied by a 14statement under oath attesting to the accuracy of the answers.15    (c-20) Any person who has been served a subpoena issued 16under this Section may file, in the Circuit Court of Sangamon 17or Cook County or the circuit court of the county in which the 18witness resides, is found, or transacts business, a petition 19for an order to modify or set aside the subpoena. A petition 20filed with the circuit court under this subsection shall be 21filed with the court and served on the Attorney General within 2220 days after the date of service of the subpoena, at any time 23before the return date specified in the subpoena, or within a 24longer period as may be prescribed in writing by the Attorney 25General. The petition shall specify the grounds upon which the 26petitioner relies in seeking relief.  HB4725 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 19322 SPS 32768 b1    (c-25) If a witness served with a subpoena by the Attorney 2General under this Act fails or refuses to attend a proceeding 3and provide testimony, produce documentary materials or 4interrogatory answers, grant access to the premises, records, 5or employees of the witness, or otherwise comply with the 6subpoena, the Attorney General may petition the Circuit Court 7of Sangamon or Cook County, or the circuit court in the county 8in which the witness resides, for an order requiring the 9witness to comply with the subpoena. The court's order shall 10require the witness to comply with the subpoena by a specified 11date and provide a date on which the witness shall show cause 12in court as to why the witness should not be held in contempt 13of court if the witness fails to comply with the order. The 14Attorney General may recover reasonable fees and expenses 15incurred in obtaining the order. If the witness is held in 16contempt of court, the Attorney General may seek a writ of 17attachment or an equivalent court order.18    (c-30) An individual, including an employer, an agent of 19the employer, or the officer or agent of any private employer, 20who, with the intent to avoid, evade, prevent, or obstruct 21compliance in whole or in part by any person who has been 22served a subpoena by the Attorney General under this Section, 23knowingly removes from any place, conceals, withholds, 24destroys, mutilates, alters, or by any other means falsifies 25any documentary material that is the subject of the subpoena 26is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.  HB4725 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 19322 SPS 32768 b1    (c-35) If, in the course of an investigation conducted in 2accordance with subsection (c), the Attorney General believes 3that relevant evidence of a violation of a law enforced by the 4Worker Protection Unit as set forth in subsection (b) is 5located at the premises of an employer or in an employer's 6records and if the employer has refused to allow the Attorney 7General to inspect the premises or the Attorney General has 8reasonable cause to believe that an immediate inspection of 9the premises is necessary to carry out its investigation, then 10the Attorney General may file or cause to be filed an 11application for an administrative inspection warrant. The 12issuance and execution of an administrative inspection warrant 13shall be as follows:14        (1) A judge of a circuit court, upon proper oath or 15    affirmation showing an inspection is reasonable, may issue 16    warrants for the purpose of conducting administrative 17    inspections and seizures of property appropriate to the 18    inspections. For the purposes of the issuance of an 19    administrative inspection warrant, an inspection is 20    reasonable if a valid public interest in the effective 21    enforcement of any statute enforced by the Worker 22    Protection Unit sufficiently justifies administrative 23    inspection of the employer's premises or records.24        (2) An administrative inspection warrant shall be 25    issued only after receipt of an affidavit of a person 26    having knowledge of the facts alleged that establishes the   HB4725 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 19322 SPS 32768 b1    grounds for issuing the administrative inspection warrant. 2    If the circuit judge is satisfied that there are 3    reasonable grounds for issuance of an administrative 4    inspection warrant, the judge shall issue an 5    administrative inspection warrant. The administrative 6    inspection warrant shall:7            (A) state the grounds for its issuance and the 8        name of each person whose affidavit has been taken in 9        support of the warrant;10            (B) be directed to an Assistant Attorney General 11        appointed by the Attorney General or to other staff of 12        the Office of the Attorney General who will execute 13        the warrant;14            (C) command the person to whom it is directed to 15        inspect the identified premises or records for the 16        purposes specified in the warrant and, if appropriate, 17        direct the seizure of the identified records or other 18        property;19            (D) identify the item or types of property to be 20        seized, if any; and21            (E) direct that the warrant may be served at any 22        time of the day or night and designate the circuit 23        court judge to whom it shall be returned.24        (3) An administrative inspection warrant issued under 25    this subsection must be executed and returned within 10 26    days after the date of its issuance, unless, upon a   HB4725 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 19322 SPS 32768 b1    showing of a need for additional time, the court that 2    issued the inspection warrant orders otherwise. If 3    property is seized in accordance with an administrative 4    inspection warrant, a copy of the inventory of the seized 5    property shall be given to the person from whom or from 6    whose controlled premises the property is taken. If no 7    person is available, the inspection warrant and a copy of 8    the inventory shall be left at the controlled premises. 9    The inventory shall be made under oath by the person 10    executing the warrant.11        (4) An administrative inspection warrant shall be 12    returnable before the judge of the circuit court who 13    issued the inspection warrant or any judge named in the 14    inspection warrant or before the circuit court. The judge 15    before whom the return is made shall attach to the 16    administrative inspection warrant a copy of the return and 17    all papers returnable in connection with the warrant and 18    file them with the clerk of the circuit court in which the 19    inspection warrant is executed.20        (5) No warrant shall be quashed or evidence suppressed 21    because of technical irregularities not affecting the 22    substantial rights of the person responsible for the 23    employer's premises or property.24        (6) This subsection does not prevent the inspection 25    without a warrant of books and records produced in 26    accordance with a subpoena issued under subsection (c).  HB4725 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 19322 SPS 32768 b1        (7) No administrative inspection warrant shall be 2    issued under this subsection with the intent of obtaining 3    evidence for an ongoing criminal investigation. 4    (d) In an action brought under this Section, the Attorney 5General may obtain, as a remedy, monetary damages to the 6State, restitution, and equitable relief, including any 7permanent or preliminary injunction, temporary restraining 8order, or other order, including an order enjoining the 9defendant from engaging in a violation, or order any action as 10may be appropriate. In addition, the Attorney General may 11request and the court may impose a civil penalty against any 12person or entity found by the court to have violated any law 13regarding labor or employment in this State, including the 14Prevailing Wage Act, the Employee Classification Act, the 15Minimum Wage Law, the Day and Temporary Labor Services Act, 16the Wage Payment and Collection Act, or any other law related 17to the payment of wages, the safety of the workplace, or fair 18employment practices, in a sum not to exceed the maximum 19amount of any civil penalty prescribed by law. Neither the 20State nor an aggrieved individual may recover monetary relief, 21including civil penalties, in more than one proceeding related 22to the same violation.23    (e) Upon the Attorney General's request, the Illinois 24Department of Labor shall provide any materials or documents 25already in the Department's possession pertaining to the 26enforcement of this Section. The Office of the Attorney   HB4725 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 19322 SPS 32768 b1General may use information obtained under this Section, 2including information that is designated as and that qualifies 3for confidential treatment, which information the Attorney 4General's Office shall maintain as confidential, for law 5enforcement purposes only, which information may be shared 6with other law enforcement officials. Nothing in this Section 7is intended to take away or limit any powers of the Attorney 8General under common law or other statutory law.9    (f) All information and documentary materials that are 10obtained by the Attorney General under this Section are exempt 11from disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act. This 12exemption applies to all information and documentary materials 13the Attorney General obtains through an investigation under 14this Act.15    Except as otherwise provided in this Section, no 16documentary materials, transcripts of oral testimony, or 17answers to interrogatories, or copies of those items, in the 18possession of the Attorney General shall be available for 19examination by any individual other than an authorized 20employee or agent of the Attorney General or a federal, State, 21or local law enforcement official without the consent of the 22person who produced the documentary materials, oral testimony, 23or answers. The Attorney General may provide copies of the 24documentary materials, transcripts of oral testimony, or 25answers to interrogatories to an official of this State, the 26federal government, or another state, who is charged with the   HB4725 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 19322 SPS 32768 b1enforcement of federal or State employment, antitrust, or 2consumer protection laws, if the receiving official agrees in 3writing, before the disclosure, that the information may not 4be disclosed to anyone other than the official or the 5official's authorized employees.6    The Attorney General may, in the Attorney General's 7discretion, use information and documentary materials obtained 8in the course of an investigation pursuant to this Act for law 9enforcement purposes, including, but not limited to, 10interviewing or questioning potential witnesses and 11consultants, in a complaint or other pleading, and in court 12proceedings. 13(Source: P.A. 101-527, eff. 1-1-20.) 14    Section 10. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by 15changing Section 7.5 as follows: 16    (5 ILCS 140/7.5)17    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-441 and 18104-457)19    Sec. 7.5. Statutory exemptions. To the extent provided for 20by the statutes referenced below, the following shall be 21exempt from inspection and copying:22        (a) All information determined to be confidential 23    under Section 4002 of the Technology Advancement and 24    Development Act.  HB4725 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 19322 SPS 32768 b1        (b) Library circulation and order records identifying 2    library users with specific materials under the Library 3    Records Confidentiality Act.4        (c) Applications, related documents, and medical 5    records received by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 6    Procedures Board and any and all documents or other 7    records prepared by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 8    Procedures Board or its staff relating to applications it 9    has received.10        (d) Information and records held by the Department of 11    Public Health and its authorized representatives relating 12    to known or suspected cases of sexually transmitted 13    infection or any information the disclosure of which is 14    restricted under the Illinois Sexually Transmitted 15    Infection Control Act.16        (e) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 17    under Section 30 of the Radon Industry Licensing Act.18        (f) Firm performance evaluations under Section 55 of 19    the Architectural, Engineering, and Land Surveying 20    Qualifications Based Selection Act.21        (g) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 22    and exempted under Section 50 of the Illinois Prepaid 23    Tuition Act.24        (h) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 25    under the State Officials and Employees Ethics Act, and 26    records of any lawfully created State or local inspector   HB4725 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 19322 SPS 32768 b1    general's office that would be exempt if created or 2    obtained by an Executive Inspector General's office under 3    that Act.4        (i) Information contained in a local emergency energy 5    plan submitted to a municipality in accordance with a 6    local emergency energy plan ordinance that is adopted 7    under Section 11-21.5-5 of the Illinois Municipal Code.8        (j) Information and data concerning the distribution 9    of surcharge moneys collected and remitted by carriers 10    under the Emergency Telephone System Act.11        (k) Law enforcement officer identification information 12    or driver identification information compiled by a law 13    enforcement agency or the Department of Transportation 14    under Section 11-212 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.15        (l) Records and information provided to a residential 16    health care facility resident sexual assault and death 17    review team or the Executive Council under the Abuse 18    Prevention Review Team Act.19        (m) Information provided to the predatory lending 20    database created pursuant to Article 3 of the Residential 21    Real Property Disclosure Act, except to the extent 22    authorized under that Article.23        (n) Defense budgets and petitions for certification of 24    compensation and expenses for court appointed trial 25    counsel as provided under Sections 10 and 15 of the 26    Capital Crimes Litigation Act (repealed). This subsection   HB4725 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 19322 SPS 32768 b1    (n) shall apply until the conclusion of the trial of the 2    case, even if the prosecution chooses not to pursue the 3    death penalty prior to trial or sentencing.4        (o) Information that is prohibited from being 5    disclosed under Section 4 of the Illinois Health and 6    Hazardous Substances Registry Act.7        (p) Security portions of system safety program plans, 8    investigation reports, surveys, schedules, lists, data, or 9    information compiled, collected, or prepared by or for the 10    Department of Transportation under Sections 2705-300 and 11    2705-616 of the Department of Transportation Law of the 12    Civil Administrative Code of Illinois, the Regional 13    Transportation Authority under Section 2.11 of the 14    Regional Transportation Authority Act, or the St. Clair 15    County Transit District under the Bi-State Transit Safety 16    Act (repealed). 17        (q) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 18    Personnel Record Review Act. 19        (r) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 20    Illinois School Student Records Act. 21        (s) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 22    under Section 5-108 of the Public Utilities Act. 23        (t) (Blank). 24        (u) Records and information provided to an independent 25    team of experts under the Developmental Disability and 26    Mental Health Safety Act (also known as Brian's Law).   HB4725 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 19322 SPS 32768 b1        (v) Names and information of people who have applied 2    for or received Firearm Owner's Identification Cards under 3    the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act or applied for 4    or received a concealed carry license under the Firearm 5    Concealed Carry Act, unless otherwise authorized by the 6    Firearm Concealed Carry Act; and databases under the 7    Firearm Concealed Carry Act, records of the Concealed 8    Carry Licensing Review Board under the Firearm Concealed 9    Carry Act, and law enforcement agency objections under the 10    Firearm Concealed Carry Act. 11        (v-5) Records of the Firearm Owner's Identification 12    Card Review Board that are exempted from disclosure under 13    Section 10 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act.14        (w) Personally identifiable information which is 15    exempted from disclosure under subsection (g) of Section 16    19.1 of the Toll Highway Act.17        (x) Information which is exempted from disclosure 18    under Section 5-1014.3 of the Counties Code or Section 19    8-11-21 of the Illinois Municipal Code. 20        (y) Confidential information under the Adult 21    Protective Services Act and its predecessor enabling 22    statute, the Elder Abuse and Neglect Act, including 23    information about the identity and administrative finding 24    against any caregiver of a verified and substantiated 25    decision of abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation of 26    an eligible adult maintained in the Registry established   HB4725 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 19322 SPS 32768 b1    under Section 7.5 of the Adult Protective Services Act. 2        (z) Records and information provided to a fatality 3    review team or the Illinois Fatality Review Team Advisory 4    Council under Section 15 of the Adult Protective Services 5    Act. 6        (aa) Information which is exempted from disclosure 7    under Section 2.37 of the Wildlife Code. 8        (bb) Information which is or was prohibited from 9    disclosure by the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. 10        (cc) Recordings made under the Law Enforcement 11    Officer-Worn Body Camera Act, except to the extent 12    authorized under that Act.13        (dd) Information that is prohibited from being 14    disclosed under Section 45 of the Condominium and Common 15    Interest Community Ombudsperson Act. 16        (ee) Information that is exempted from disclosure 17    under Section 30.1 of the Pharmacy Practice Act. 18        (ff) Information that is exempted from disclosure 19    under the Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act. 20        (gg) Information that is prohibited from being 21    disclosed under Section 7-603.5 of the Illinois Vehicle 22    Code. 23        (hh) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 24    Section 1A-16.7 of the Election Code. 25        (ii) Information which is exempted from disclosure 26    under Section 2505-800 of the Department of Revenue Law of   HB4725 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 19322 SPS 32768 b1    the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 2        (jj) Information and reports that are required to be 3    submitted to the Department of Labor by registering day 4    and temporary labor service agencies but are exempt from 5    disclosure under subsection (a-1) of Section 45 of the Day 6    and Temporary Labor Services Act. 7        (kk) Information prohibited from disclosure under the 8    Seizure and Forfeiture Reporting Act. 9        (ll) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 10    and exempted under Section 5-30.8 of the Illinois Public 11    Aid Code. 12        (mm) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 13    Section 4.2 of the Crime Victims Compensation Act. 14        (nn) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 15    Section 70 of the Higher Education Student Assistance Act. 16        (oo) Communications, notes, records, and reports 17    arising out of a peer support counseling session 18    prohibited from disclosure under the First Responders 19    Suicide Prevention Act. 20        (pp) Names and all identifying information relating to 21    an employee of an emergency services provider or law 22    enforcement agency under the First Responders Suicide 23    Prevention Act. 24        (qq) Information and records held by the Department of 25    Public Health and its authorized representatives collected 26    under the Reproductive Health Act.   HB4725 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 19322 SPS 32768 b1        (rr) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 2    the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. 3        (ss) Data reported by an employer to the Department of 4    Human Rights pursuant to Section 2-108 of the Illinois 5    Human Rights Act.6        (tt) Recordings made under the Children's Advocacy 7    Center Act, except to the extent authorized under that 8    Act. 9        (uu) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 10    Section 50 of the Sexual Assault Evidence Submission Act. 11        (vv) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 12    subsections (f) and (j) of Section 5-36 of the Illinois 13    Public Aid Code. 14        (ww) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 15    Section 16.8 of the State Treasurer Act. 16        (xx) Information that is exempt from disclosure or 17    information that shall not be made public under the 18    Illinois Insurance Code. 19        (yy) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 20    the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act.21        (zz) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 22    the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act. 23        (aaa) Information prohibited from being disclosed 24    under Section 1-167 of the Illinois Pension Code. 25        (bbb) Information that is prohibited from disclosure 26    by the Illinois Police Training Act and the Illinois State   HB4725 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 19322 SPS 32768 b1    Police Act. 2        (ccc) Records exempt from disclosure under Section 3    2605-304 of the Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 4    Administrative Code of Illinois. 5        (ddd) Information prohibited from being disclosed 6    under Section 35 of the Address Confidentiality for 7    Victims of Domestic Violence, Sexual Assault, Human 8    Trafficking, or Stalking Act. 9        (eee) Information prohibited from being disclosed 10    under subsection (b) of Section 75 of the Domestic 11    Violence Fatality Review Act. 12        (fff) Images from cameras under the Expressway Camera 13    Act and all automated license plate reader (ALPR) 14    information used and collected by the Illinois State 15    Police. "ALPR information" means information gathered by 16    an ALPR or created from the analysis of data generated by 17    an ALPR. This subsection (fff) is inoperative on and after 18    July 1, 2028.19        (ggg) Information prohibited from disclosure under 20    paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Section 14 of the Nurse 21    Agency Licensing Act. 22        (hhh) Information submitted to the Illinois State 23    Police in an affidavit or application for an assault 24    weapon endorsement, assault weapon attachment endorsement, 25    .50 caliber rifle endorsement, or .50 caliber cartridge 26    endorsement under the Firearm Owners Identification Card   HB4725 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 19322 SPS 32768 b1    Act. 2        (iii) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 50 of 3    the School Safety Drill Act. 4        (jjj) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 5    30 of the Insurance Data Security Law. 6        (kkk) Confidential business information prohibited 7    from disclosure under Section 45 of the Paint Stewardship 8    Act. 9        (lll) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 10    2-3.196 of the School Code. 11        (mmm) Information prohibited from being disclosed 12    under subsection (e) of Section 1-129 of the Illinois 13    Power Agency Act. 14        (nnn) Materials received by the Department of Commerce 15    and Economic Opportunity that are confidential under the 16    Music and Musicians Tax Credit and Jobs Act. 17        (ooo) Data or information provided pursuant to Section 18    20 of the Statewide Recycling Needs and Assessment Act. 19        (ppp) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 20    Section 28-11 of the Lawful Health Care Activity Act. 21        (qqq) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 22    Section 7-101 of the Illinois Human Rights Act. 23        (rrr) Information prohibited from being disclosed 24    under Section 4-2 of the Uniform Money Transmission 25    Modernization Act. 26        (sss) Information exempt from disclosure under Section   HB4725 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 19322 SPS 32768 b1    40 of the Student-Athlete Endorsement Rights Act.2        (ttt) Audio recordings made under Section 30 of the 3    Illinois State Police Act, except to the extent authorized 4    under that Section. 5        (uuu) Information prohibited from being disclosed 6    under Section 30-5 of the Digital Assets Regulation Act.7        (www) Information and documentary materials obtained 8    by the Office of the Attorney General under Section 6.3 of 9    the Attorney General Act that are exempt from disclosure 10    under that Section. 11(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-34, eff. 6-9-23; 12103-142, eff. 1-1-24; 103-372, eff. 1-1-24; 103-472, eff. 138-1-24; 103-508, eff. 8-4-23; 103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 103-592, 14eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-636, eff. 7-1-24; 15103-724, eff. 1-1-25; 103-786, eff. 8-7-24; 103-859, eff. 168-9-24; 103-991, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1049, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1081, 17eff. 3-21-25; 104-10, eff. 6-16-25; 104-18, eff. 6-30-25; 18104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 104-428, eff. 8-18-25; revised 199-10-25.) 20    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-457 but 21before 104-441)22    Sec. 7.5. Statutory exemptions. To the extent provided for 23by the statutes referenced below, the following shall be 24exempt from inspection and copying:25        (a) All information determined to be confidential   HB4725 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 19322 SPS 32768 b1    under Section 4002 of the Technology Advancement and 2    Development Act.3        (b) Library circulation and order records identifying 4    library users with specific materials under the Library 5    Records Confidentiality Act.6        (c) Applications, related documents, and medical 7    records received by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 8    Procedures Board and any and all documents or other 9    records prepared by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 10    Procedures Board or its staff relating to applications it 11    has received.12        (d) Information and records held by the Department of 13    Public Health and its authorized representatives relating 14    to known or suspected cases of sexually transmitted 15    infection or any information the disclosure of which is 16    restricted under the Illinois Sexually Transmitted 17    Infection Control Act.18        (e) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 19    under Section 30 of the Radon Industry Licensing Act.20        (f) Firm performance evaluations under Section 55 of 21    the Architectural, Engineering, and Land Surveying 22    Qualifications Based Selection Act.23        (g) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 24    and exempted under Section 50 of the Illinois Prepaid 25    Tuition Act.26        (h) Information the disclosure of which is exempted   HB4725 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 19322 SPS 32768 b1    under the State Officials and Employees Ethics Act, and 2    records of any lawfully created State or local inspector 3    general's office that would be exempt if created or 4    obtained by an Executive Inspector General's office under 5    that Act.6        (i) Information contained in a local emergency energy 7    plan submitted to a municipality in accordance with a 8    local emergency energy plan ordinance that is adopted 9    under Section 11-21.5-5 of the Illinois Municipal Code.10        (j) Information and data concerning the distribution 11    of surcharge moneys collected and remitted by carriers 12    under the Emergency Telephone System Act.13        (k) Law enforcement officer identification information 14    or driver identification information compiled by a law 15    enforcement agency or the Department of Transportation 16    under Section 11-212 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.17        (l) Records and information provided to a residential 18    health care facility resident sexual assault and death 19    review team or the Executive Council under the Abuse 20    Prevention Review Team Act.21        (m) Information provided to the predatory lending 22    database created pursuant to Article 3 of the Residential 23    Real Property Disclosure Act, except to the extent 24    authorized under that Article.25        (n) Defense budgets and petitions for certification of 26    compensation and expenses for court appointed trial   HB4725 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 19322 SPS 32768 b1    counsel as provided under Sections 10 and 15 of the 2    Capital Crimes Litigation Act (repealed). This subsection 3    (n) shall apply until the conclusion of the trial of the 4    case, even if the prosecution chooses not to pursue the 5    death penalty prior to trial or sentencing.6        (o) Information that is prohibited from being 7    disclosed under Section 4 of the Illinois Health and 8    Hazardous Substances Registry Act.9        (p) Security portions of system safety program plans, 10    investigation reports, surveys, schedules, lists, data, or 11    information compiled, collected, or prepared by or for the 12    Department of Transportation under Sections 2705-300 and 13    2705-616 of the Department of Transportation Law of the 14    Civil Administrative Code of Illinois, the Northern 15    Illinois Transit Authority under Section 2.11 of the 16    Northern Illinois Transit Authority Act, or the St. Clair 17    County Transit District under the Bi-State Transit Safety 18    Act (repealed). 19        (q) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 20    Personnel Record Review Act. 21        (r) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 22    Illinois School Student Records Act. 23        (s) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 24    under Section 5-108 of the Public Utilities Act. 25        (t) (Blank). 26        (u) Records and information provided to an independent   HB4725 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 19322 SPS 32768 b1    team of experts under the Developmental Disability and 2    Mental Health Safety Act (also known as Brian's Law). 3        (v) Names and information of people who have applied 4    for or received Firearm Owner's Identification Cards under 5    the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act or applied for 6    or received a concealed carry license under the Firearm 7    Concealed Carry Act, unless otherwise authorized by the 8    Firearm Concealed Carry Act; and databases under the 9    Firearm Concealed Carry Act, records of the Concealed 10    Carry Licensing Review Board under the Firearm Concealed 11    Carry Act, and law enforcement agency objections under the 12    Firearm Concealed Carry Act. 13        (v-5) Records of the Firearm Owner's Identification 14    Card Review Board that are exempted from disclosure under 15    Section 10 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act.16        (w) Personally identifiable information which is 17    exempted from disclosure under subsection (g) of Section 18    19.1 of the Toll Highway Act.19        (x) Information which is exempted from disclosure 20    under Section 5-1014.3 of the Counties Code or Section 21    8-11-21 of the Illinois Municipal Code. 22        (y) Confidential information under the Adult 23    Protective Services Act and its predecessor enabling 24    statute, the Elder Abuse and Neglect Act, including 25    information about the identity and administrative finding 26    against any caregiver of a verified and substantiated   HB4725 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 19322 SPS 32768 b1    decision of abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation of 2    an eligible adult maintained in the Registry established 3    under Section 7.5 of the Adult Protective Services Act. 4        (z) Records and information provided to a fatality 5    review team or the Illinois Fatality Review Team Advisory 6    Council under Section 15 of the Adult Protective Services 7    Act. 8        (aa) Information which is exempted from disclosure 9    under Section 2.37 of the Wildlife Code. 10        (bb) Information which is or was prohibited from 11    disclosure by the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. 12        (cc) Recordings made under the Law Enforcement 13    Officer-Worn Body Camera Act, except to the extent 14    authorized under that Act.15        (dd) Information that is prohibited from being 16    disclosed under Section 45 of the Condominium and Common 17    Interest Community Ombudsperson Act. 18        (ee) Information that is exempted from disclosure 19    under Section 30.1 of the Pharmacy Practice Act. 20        (ff) Information that is exempted from disclosure 21    under the Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act. 22        (gg) Information that is prohibited from being 23    disclosed under Section 7-603.5 of the Illinois Vehicle 24    Code. 25        (hh) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 26    Section 1A-16.7 of the Election Code.   HB4725 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 19322 SPS 32768 b1        (ii) Information which is exempted from disclosure 2    under Section 2505-800 of the Department of Revenue Law of 3    the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 4        (jj) Information and reports that are required to be 5    submitted to the Department of Labor by registering day 6    and temporary labor service agencies but are exempt from 7    disclosure under subsection (a-1) of Section 45 of the Day 8    and Temporary Labor Services Act. 9        (kk) Information prohibited from disclosure under the 10    Seizure and Forfeiture Reporting Act. 11        (ll) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 12    and exempted under Section 5-30.8 of the Illinois Public 13    Aid Code. 14        (mm) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 15    Section 4.2 of the Crime Victims Compensation Act. 16        (nn) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 17    Section 70 of the Higher Education Student Assistance Act. 18        (oo) Communications, notes, records, and reports 19    arising out of a peer support counseling session 20    prohibited from disclosure under the First Responders 21    Suicide Prevention Act. 22        (pp) Names and all identifying information relating to 23    an employee of an emergency services provider or law 24    enforcement agency under the First Responders Suicide 25    Prevention Act. 26        (qq) Information and records held by the Department of   HB4725 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 19322 SPS 32768 b1    Public Health and its authorized representatives collected 2    under the Reproductive Health Act. 3        (rr) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 4    the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. 5        (ss) Data reported by an employer to the Department of 6    Human Rights pursuant to Section 2-108 of the Illinois 7    Human Rights Act.8        (tt) Recordings made under the Children's Advocacy 9    Center Act, except to the extent authorized under that 10    Act. 11        (uu) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 12    Section 50 of the Sexual Assault Evidence Submission Act. 13        (vv) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 14    subsections (f) and (j) of Section 5-36 of the Illinois 15    Public Aid Code. 16        (ww) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 17    Section 16.8 of the State Treasurer Act. 18        (xx) Information that is exempt from disclosure or 19    information that shall not be made public under the 20    Illinois Insurance Code. 21        (yy) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 22    the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act.23        (zz) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 24    the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act. 25        (aaa) Information prohibited from being disclosed 26    under Section 1-167 of the Illinois Pension Code.   HB4725 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 19322 SPS 32768 b1        (bbb) Information that is prohibited from disclosure 2    by the Illinois Police Training Act and the Illinois State 3    Police Act. 4        (ccc) Records exempt from disclosure under Section 5    2605-304 of the Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 6    Administrative Code of Illinois. 7        (ddd) Information prohibited from being disclosed 8    under Section 35 of the Address Confidentiality for 9    Victims of Domestic Violence, Sexual Assault, Human 10    Trafficking, or Stalking Act. 11        (eee) Information prohibited from being disclosed 12    under subsection (b) of Section 75 of the Domestic 13    Violence Fatality Review Act. 14        (fff) Images from cameras under the Expressway Camera 15    Act and all automated license plate reader (ALPR) 16    information used and collected by the Illinois State 17    Police. "ALPR information" means information gathered by 18    an ALPR or created from the analysis of data generated by 19    an ALPR. This subsection (fff) is inoperative on and after 20    July 1, 2028.21        (ggg) Information prohibited from disclosure under 22    paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Section 14 of the Nurse 23    Agency Licensing Act. 24        (hhh) Information submitted to the Illinois State 25    Police in an affidavit or application for an assault 26    weapon endorsement, assault weapon attachment endorsement,   HB4725 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 19322 SPS 32768 b1    .50 caliber rifle endorsement, or .50 caliber cartridge 2    endorsement under the Firearm Owners Identification Card 3    Act. 4        (iii) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 50 of 5    the School Safety Drill Act. 6        (jjj) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 7    30 of the Insurance Data Security Law. 8        (kkk) Confidential business information prohibited 9    from disclosure under Section 45 of the Paint Stewardship 10    Act. 11        (lll) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 12    2-3.196 of the School Code. 13        (mmm) Information prohibited from being disclosed 14    under subsection (e) of Section 1-129 of the Illinois 15    Power Agency Act. 16        (nnn) Materials received by the Department of Commerce 17    and Economic Opportunity that are confidential under the 18    Music and Musicians Tax Credit and Jobs Act. 19        (ooo) Data or information provided pursuant to Section 20    20 of the Statewide Recycling Needs and Assessment Act. 21        (ppp) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 22    Section 28-11 of the Lawful Health Care Activity Act. 23        (qqq) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 24    Section 7-101 of the Illinois Human Rights Act. 25        (rrr) Information prohibited from being disclosed 26    under Section 4-2 of the Uniform Money Transmission   HB4725 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 19322 SPS 32768 b1    Modernization Act. 2        (sss) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 3    40 of the Student-Athlete Endorsement Rights Act.4        (ttt) Audio recordings made under Section 30 of the 5    Illinois State Police Act, except to the extent authorized 6    under that Section. 7        (uuu) Information prohibited from being disclosed 8    under Section 30-5 of the Digital Assets Regulation Act.9        (www) Information and documentary materials obtained 10    by the Office of the Attorney General under Section 6.3 of 11    the Attorney General Act that are exempt from disclosure 12    under that Section. 13(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-34, eff. 6-9-23; 14103-142, eff. 1-1-24; 103-372, eff. 1-1-24; 103-472, eff. 158-1-24; 103-508, eff. 8-4-23; 103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 103-592, 16eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-636, eff. 7-1-24; 17103-724, eff. 1-1-25; 103-786, eff. 8-7-24; 103-859, eff. 188-9-24; 103-991, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1049, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1081, 19eff. 3-21-25; 104-10, eff. 6-16-25; 104-18, eff. 6-30-25; 20104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 104-428, eff. 8-18-25; 104-457, eff. 216-1-26; revised 1-7-26.) 22    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-441)23    Sec. 7.5. Statutory exemptions. To the extent provided for 24by the statutes referenced below, the following shall be 25exempt from inspection and copying:  HB4725 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 19322 SPS 32768 b1        (a) All information determined to be confidential 2    under Section 4002 of the Technology Advancement and 3    Development Act.4        (b) Library circulation and order records identifying 5    library users with specific materials under the Library 6    Records Confidentiality Act.7        (c) Applications, related documents, and medical 8    records received by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 9    Procedures Board and any and all documents or other 10    records prepared by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 11    Procedures Board or its staff relating to applications it 12    has received.13        (d) Information and records held by the Department of 14    Public Health and its authorized representatives relating 15    to known or suspected cases of sexually transmitted 16    infection or any information the disclosure of which is 17    restricted under the Illinois Sexually Transmitted 18    Infection Control Act.19        (e) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 20    under Section 30 of the Radon Industry Licensing Act.21        (f) Firm performance evaluations under Section 55 of 22    the Architectural, Engineering, and Land Surveying 23    Qualifications Based Selection Act.24        (g) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 25    and exempted under Section 50 of the Illinois Prepaid 26    Tuition Act.  HB4725 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 19322 SPS 32768 b1        (h) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 2    under the State Officials and Employees Ethics Act, and 3    records of any lawfully created State or local inspector 4    general's office that would be exempt if created or 5    obtained by an Executive Inspector General's office under 6    that Act.7        (i) Information contained in a local emergency energy 8    plan submitted to a municipality in accordance with a 9    local emergency energy plan ordinance that is adopted 10    under Section 11-21.5-5 of the Illinois Municipal Code.11        (j) Information and data concerning the distribution 12    of surcharge moneys collected and remitted by carriers 13    under the Emergency Telephone System Act.14        (k) Law enforcement officer identification information 15    or driver identification information compiled by a law 16    enforcement agency or the Department of Transportation 17    under Section 11-212 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.18        (l) Records and information provided to a residential 19    health care facility resident sexual assault and death 20    review team or the Executive Council under the Abuse 21    Prevention Review Team Act.22        (m) Information provided to the predatory lending 23    database created pursuant to Article 3 of the Residential 24    Real Property Disclosure Act, except to the extent 25    authorized under that Article.26        (n) Defense budgets and petitions for certification of   HB4725 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 19322 SPS 32768 b1    compensation and expenses for court appointed trial 2    counsel as provided under Sections 10 and 15 of the 3    Capital Crimes Litigation Act (repealed). This subsection 4    (n) shall apply until the conclusion of the trial of the 5    case, even if the prosecution chooses not to pursue the 6    death penalty prior to trial or sentencing.7        (o) Information that is prohibited from being 8    disclosed under Section 4 of the Illinois Health and 9    Hazardous Substances Registry Act.10        (p) Security portions of system safety program plans, 11    investigation reports, surveys, schedules, lists, data, or 12    information compiled, collected, or prepared by or for the 13    Department of Transportation under Sections 2705-300 and 14    2705-616 of the Department of Transportation Law of the 15    Civil Administrative Code of Illinois, the Northern 16    Illinois Transit Authority under Section 2.11 of the 17    Northern Illinois Transit Authority Act, or the St. Clair 18    County Transit District under the Bi-State Transit Safety 19    Act (repealed). 20        (q) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 21    Personnel Record Review Act. 22        (r) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 23    Illinois School Student Records Act. 24        (s) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 25    under Section 5-108 of the Public Utilities Act. 26        (t) (Blank).   HB4725 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 19322 SPS 32768 b1        (u) Records and information provided to an independent 2    team of experts under the Developmental Disability and 3    Mental Health Safety Act (also known as Brian's Law). 4        (v) Names and information of people who have applied 5    for or received Firearm Owner's Identification Cards under 6    the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act or applied for 7    or received a concealed carry license under the Firearm 8    Concealed Carry Act, unless otherwise authorized by the 9    Firearm Concealed Carry Act; and databases under the 10    Firearm Concealed Carry Act, records of the Concealed 11    Carry Licensing Review Board under the Firearm Concealed 12    Carry Act, and law enforcement agency objections under the 13    Firearm Concealed Carry Act. 14        (v-5) Records of the Firearm Owner's Identification 15    Card Review Board that are exempted from disclosure under 16    Section 10 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act.17        (w) Personally identifiable information which is 18    exempted from disclosure under subsection (g) of Section 19    19.1 of the Toll Highway Act.20        (x) Information which is exempted from disclosure 21    under Section 5-1014.3 of the Counties Code or Section 22    8-11-21 of the Illinois Municipal Code. 23        (y) Confidential information under the Adult 24    Protective Services Act and its predecessor enabling 25    statute, the Elder Abuse and Neglect Act, including 26    information about the identity and administrative finding   HB4725 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 19322 SPS 32768 b1    against any caregiver of a verified and substantiated 2    decision of abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation of 3    an eligible adult maintained in the Registry established 4    under Section 7.5 of the Adult Protective Services Act. 5        (z) Records and information provided to a fatality 6    review team or the Illinois Fatality Review Team Advisory 7    Council under Section 15 of the Adult Protective Services 8    Act. 9        (aa) Information which is exempted from disclosure 10    under Section 2.37 of the Wildlife Code. 11        (bb) Information which is or was prohibited from 12    disclosure by the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. 13        (cc) Recordings made under the Law Enforcement 14    Officer-Worn Body Camera Act, except to the extent 15    authorized under that Act.16        (dd) Information that is prohibited from being 17    disclosed under Section 45 of the Condominium and Common 18    Interest Community Ombudsperson Act. 19        (ee) Information that is exempted from disclosure 20    under Section 30.1 of the Pharmacy Practice Act. 21        (ff) Information that is exempted from disclosure 22    under the Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act. 23        (gg) Information that is prohibited from being 24    disclosed under Section 7-603.5 of the Illinois Vehicle 25    Code. 26        (hh) Records that are exempt from disclosure under   HB4725 Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 19322 SPS 32768 b1    Section 1A-16.7 of the Election Code. 2        (ii) Information which is exempted from disclosure 3    under Section 2505-800 of the Department of Revenue Law of 4    the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 5        (jj) Information and reports that are required to be 6    submitted to the Department of Labor by registering day 7    and temporary labor service agencies but are exempt from 8    disclosure under subsection (a-1) of Section 45 of the Day 9    and Temporary Labor Services Act. 10        (kk) Information prohibited from disclosure under the 11    Seizure and Forfeiture Reporting Act. 12        (ll) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 13    and exempted under Section 5-30.8 of the Illinois Public 14    Aid Code. 15        (mm) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 16    Section 4.2 of the Crime Victims Compensation Act. 17        (nn) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 18    Section 70 of the Higher Education Student Assistance Act. 19        (oo) Communications, notes, records, and reports 20    arising out of a peer support counseling session 21    prohibited from disclosure under the First Responders 22    Suicide Prevention Act. 23        (pp) Names and all identifying information relating to 24    an employee of an emergency services provider or law 25    enforcement agency under the First Responders Suicide 26    Prevention Act.   HB4725 Enrolled- 38 -LRB104 19322 SPS 32768 b1        (qq) Information and records held by the Department of 2    Public Health and its authorized representatives collected 3    under the Reproductive Health Act. 4        (rr) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 5    the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. 6        (ss) Data reported by an employer to the Department of 7    Human Rights pursuant to Section 2-108 of the Illinois 8    Human Rights Act.9        (tt) Recordings made under the Children's Advocacy 10    Center Act, except to the extent authorized under that 11    Act. 12        (uu) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 13    Section 50 of the Sexual Assault Evidence Submission Act. 14        (vv) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 15    subsections (f) and (j) of Section 5-36 of the Illinois 16    Public Aid Code. 17        (ww) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 18    Section 16.8 of the State Treasurer Act. 19        (xx) Information that is exempt from disclosure or 20    information that shall not be made public under the 21    Illinois Insurance Code. 22        (yy) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 23    the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act.24        (zz) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 25    the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act. 26        (aaa) Information prohibited from being disclosed   HB4725 Enrolled- 39 -LRB104 19322 SPS 32768 b1    under Section 1-167 of the Illinois Pension Code. 2        (bbb) Information that is prohibited from disclosure 3    by the Illinois Police Training Act and the Illinois State 4    Police Act. 5        (ccc) Records exempt from disclosure under Section 6    2605-304 of the Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 7    Administrative Code of Illinois. 8        (ddd) Information prohibited from being disclosed 9    under Section 35 of the Address Confidentiality for 10    Victims of Domestic Violence, Sexual Assault, Human 11    Trafficking, or Stalking Act. 12        (eee) Information prohibited from being disclosed 13    under subsection (b) of Section 75 of the Domestic 14    Violence Fatality Review Act. 15        (fff) Images from cameras under the Expressway Camera 16    Act and all automated license plate reader (ALPR) 17    information used and collected by the Illinois State 18    Police. "ALPR information" means information gathered by 19    an ALPR or created from the analysis of data generated by 20    an ALPR. This subsection (fff) is inoperative on and after 21    July 1, 2028.22        (ggg) Information prohibited from disclosure under 23    paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Section 14 of the Nurse 24    Agency Licensing Act. 25        (hhh) Information submitted to the Illinois State 26    Police in an affidavit or application for an assault   HB4725 Enrolled- 40 -LRB104 19322 SPS 32768 b1    weapon endorsement, assault weapon attachment endorsement, 2    .50 caliber rifle endorsement, or .50 caliber cartridge 3    endorsement under the Firearm Owners Identification Card 4    Act. 5        (iii) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 50 of 6    the School Safety Drill Act. 7        (jjj) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 8    30 of the Insurance Data Security Law. 9        (kkk) Confidential business information prohibited 10    from disclosure under Section 45 of the Paint Stewardship 11    Act. 12        (lll) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 13    2-3.196 of the School Code. 14        (mmm) Information prohibited from being disclosed 15    under subsection (e) of Section 1-129 of the Illinois 16    Power Agency Act. 17        (nnn) Materials received by the Department of Commerce 18    and Economic Opportunity that are confidential under the 19    Music and Musicians Tax Credit and Jobs Act. 20        (ooo) Data or information provided pursuant to Section 21    20 of the Statewide Recycling Needs and Assessment Act. 22        (ppp) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 23    Section 28-11 of the Lawful Health Care Activity Act. 24        (qqq) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 25    Section 7-101 of the Illinois Human Rights Act. 26        (rrr) Information prohibited from being disclosed   HB4725 Enrolled- 41 -LRB104 19322 SPS 32768 b1    under Section 4-2 of the Uniform Money Transmission 2    Modernization Act. 3        (sss) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 4    40 of the Student-Athlete Endorsement Rights Act.5        (ttt) Audio recordings made under Section 30 of the 6    Illinois State Police Act, except to the extent authorized 7    under that Section. 8        (uuu) Information prohibited from being disclosed 9    under Section 30-5 of the Digital Assets Regulation Act.10        (vvv) (uuu) Information exempt from disclosure under 11    Section 70 of the End-of-Life Options for Terminally Ill 12    Patients Act.13        (www) Information and documentary materials obtained 14    by the Office of the Attorney General under Section 6.3 of 15    the Attorney General Act that are exempt from disclosure 16    under that Section. 17(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-34, eff. 6-9-23; 18103-142, eff. 1-1-24; 103-372, eff. 1-1-24; 103-472, eff. 198-1-24; 103-508, eff. 8-4-23; 103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 103-592, 20eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-636, eff. 7-1-24; 21103-724, eff. 1-1-25; 103-786, eff. 8-7-24; 103-859, eff. 228-9-24; 103-991, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1049, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1081, 23eff. 3-21-25; 104-10, eff. 6-16-25; 104-18, eff. 6-30-25; 24104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 104-428, eff. 8-18-25; 104-441, eff. 259-12-26; 104-457, eff. 6-1-26; revised 1-7-26.)   HB4725 Enrolled- 42 -LRB104 19322 SPS 32768 b1    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 2changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 3that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 4represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 5not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 6made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 7Public Act.